Nevada, session 83, SB325.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 244 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If a county owns and operates an animal shelter or the
board of county commissioners appropriates money to an animal
shelter to provide care and shelter to animals, the board of county
commissioners may establish a program to waive the adoption fee
of an animal that is 6 months or older, has been at the animal
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
shelter for at least 7 consecutive days and is adopted from the
animal shelter by a person who is a veteran, law enforcement
officer or first responder.
2. A program established pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Waive the adoption fee for not more than one animal that
meets the requirements of subsection 1 for a period of 6 months
for each veteran, law enforcement officer or first responder who
adopts such an animal from the animal shelter;
(b) Require a veteran, law enforcement officer or first
responder who wishes to adopt an animal under the program to
present a valid form of identification that confirms that he or she
is a veteran, law enforcement officer or first responder;
(c) Report to the board of county commissioners the number of
animals adopted under the program and whether each animal was
adopted by a veteran, law enforcement officer or first responder;
and
(d) Require the animal shelter to maintain records of each
adoption made under the program.
3. On or before October 1 of each even-numbered year after
the board of county commissioners establishes a program
pursuant to subsection 1, the board of county commissioners shall
submit a report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau
for transmittal to the next regular session of the Legislature that
includes the number of animals adopted under a program
established pursuant to subsection 1 and whether each animal was
adopted by a veteran, law enforcement officer or first responder.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Adoption fee” does not include a licensing fee,
vaccination fee or any fees for the medical treatment of the
animal.
(b) “Emergency medical provider” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 450B.199.
(c) “Firefighter” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 450B.071.
(d) “First responder” means a firefighter or emergency
medical provider.
(e) “Law enforcement officer” means any officer of the United
States or this State or a political subdivision thereof who is
empowered by law to conduct investigations or make arrests.
(f) “Veteran” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 417.125.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 2. Chapter 268 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If an incorporated city owns and operates an animal
shelter or the governing body of an incorporated city appropriates
money to an animal shelter to provide care and shelter to animals,
the governing body of the city may establish a program to waive
the adoption fee of an animal that is 6 months or older, has been
at the animal shelter for at least 7 consecutive days and is adopted
from the animal shelter by a person who is a veteran, law
enforcement officer or first responder.
2. A program established pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Waive the adoption fee for not more than one animal that
meets the requirements of subsection 1 for a period of 6 months
for each veteran, law enforcement officer or first responder who
adopts such an animal from the animal shelter;
(b) Require a veteran, law enforcement officer or first
responder who wishes to adopt an animal under the program to
present a valid form of identification that confirms that he or she
is a veteran, law enforcement officer or first responder;
(c) Report to the governing body of the city the number of
animals adopted under the program and whether each animal was
adopted by a veteran, law enforcement officer or first responder;
and
(d) Require the animal shelter to maintain records of each
adoption made under the program.
3. On or before October 1 of each even-numbered year after a
governing body of an incorporated city establishes a program
pursuant to subsection 1, the governing body of an incorporated
city shall submit a report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the next regular session of the
Legislature that includes the number of animals adopted under a
program established pursuant to subsection 1 and whether each
animal was adopted by a veteran, law enforcement officer or first
responder.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Adoption fee” does not include a licensing fee,
vaccination fee or any fees for the medical treatment of the
animal.
(b) “Emergency medical provider” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 450B.199.
(c) “Firefighter” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 450B.071.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(d) “First responder” means a firefighter or emergency
medical provider.
(e) “Law enforcement officer” means any officer of the United
States or this State or a political subdivision thereof who is
empowered by law to conduct investigations or make arrests.
(f) “Veteran” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 417.125.
Secs. 3-5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 7. (Deleted by amendment.)
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)